Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.901

Transfer of certain powers, duties, functions, and assets of the public printer.

(1) The public printer is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions, to the extent provided in chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All references to the public printer in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of enterprise services.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the public printer shall be delivered to the custody of the department of enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the public printer shall be made available to the department of enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the public printer shall be assigned to the department of enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the public printer shall, on October 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of enterprise services.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the public printer shall be continued and acted upon by the department of enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of enterprise services.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the public printer shall not affect the validity of any act performed before October 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the public printer engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of enterprise services are transferred to the department of enterprise services.

(a) The commercial agreement between the graphic communications conference of the international brotherhood of teamsters, local 767M and the department of printing-bindery that became effective July 1, 2007, shall remain in effect during its duration. Upon expiration, the parties may extend the terms of the agreement; however, the agreement may not be extended beyond September 30, 2011. Beginning October 1, 2011, chapter 41.80 RCW shall apply to the department of enterprise services with respect to employees in positions formerly covered under the expired commercial agreement.

(b) The commercial agreement between the graphic communications conference of the international brotherhood of teamsters, local 767M and the department of printing-litho that became effective July 1, 2007, shall remain in effect during its duration. Upon expiration, the parties may extend the terms of the agreement; however, the agreement may not be extended beyond September 30, 2011. Beginning October 1, 2011, chapter 41.80 RCW shall apply to the department of enterprise services with respect to the employees in positions formerly covered under the expired commercial agreement.

(c) The typographical contract between the communications workers of America, the newspaper guild, local 37082, and the department of printing-typographical that became effective July 1, 2007, shall remain in effect during its duration. Upon expiration, the parties may extend the terms of the agreement; however, the agreement may not be extended beyond September 30, 2011. Beginning October 1, 2011, chapter 41.80 RCW shall apply to the department of enterprise services with respect to the employees in positions formerly covered under the expired typographical contract.

(d) All other employees of the public printer not covered by the contracts and agreements specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW until October 1, 2011, at which time these employees shall be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, unless otherwise deemed exempt in accordance with that chapter.

(7) Unless or until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to RCW 41.80.911:

(a) The bargaining units of printing craft employees existing on October 1, 2011, shall be considered an appropriate unit at the department of enterprise services and will be so certified by the public employment relations commission; and

(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the bargaining units of printing craft employees existing on October 1, 2011, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1003.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.